Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
County Aid

207.020.
Fiscal courts may appropriate money for relief of the blind. [Repealed.]

207.030.
Payment of relief by counties. [Repealed.]

207.040.
Qualifications for county relief — Application — Procedure. [Repealed.]

207.050.
Persons not entitled to relief. [Repealed.]

207.060.
Eligibility for state aid. [Repealed.]

207.070.
Amount of state aid. [Repealed.]

207.080.
Duties of department. [Repealed.]

207.085.
Social Security appropriations not to lapse at end of first fiscal year of biennium. [Renumbered.]

207.090.
Records to be confidential — Rules governing. [Repealed.]

207.100.
Right of appeal. [Repealed.]

207.110.
Aid inalienable and exempt from execution. [Repealed.]

207.120.
Advisory commission for coordination of services for the blind. [Repealed.]